Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1599.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 66 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 2816. Membership in regional transmission organization.(a) Membership.--An electric distribution company shall be a member of a regional transmission organization.(b) Filing of report.--On or before February 1 each year, an electric distribution company shall submit to the commission a report on any recorded vote cast by the electric distribution company or, subject to subsection (c), an affiliate of the electric distribution company at a meeting of a regional transmission organization during the immediately preceding calendar year.123456789101112131415161718 (c) Contents of report.--The report under subsection (b) shall include:(1) All recorded votes cast by the electric distribution company, regardless of whether the vote is otherwise disclosed.(2) All votes cast by an affiliate of the electric distribution company, if the electric distribution company itself did not vote on the matter.(3) A brief description explaining how each vote cast by the electric distribution company or its affiliate is in the interest of the public. Each description shall be no less than 20 words in length and no more than 100 words in length.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Affiliate." A corporation or person with an affiliated interest as defined in section 2101 (relating to definition of affiliated interest)."Meeting." A committee, user group, task force or other part of a regional transmission organization in which votes are taken."Recorded vote." A vote that is tabulated, either individually or as part of a sector, for any purpose at a meeting, regardless of:(1) whether the vote represents a final position of any person casting the vote; or(2) the decision-making authority of those voting."Regional transmission organization." An entity that qualifies as a regional transmission organization under 18 CFR 35.34 (relating to regional transmission organizations).20250HB1599PN1913 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1599PN1913 - 3 - 1